Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 3

Defensive Pleas

20-6-301. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-6-301 (Code 1858, §§ 2902, 2903 (deriv. Acts 1777 (Nov.), ch. 8, § 6; 1827, ch. 74, § 2; 1849-1850, ch. 60, § 2); Shan., §§ 4623, 4624; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8751, 8752; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-903), concerning grounds for pleas in abatement, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 538, § 1.

20-6-302. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-6-302 (Code 1858, § 2904 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 60, § 2); Shan., § 4625; Code 1932, § 8753; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-904), concerning the applicability of former §20-6-301, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2009.

20-6-303. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-6-303 (Code 1858, § 2901 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 26); Shan., § 4622; Code 1932, § 8750; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-905), concerning verification of pleas in abatement, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 538, § 1.

20-6-304. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-6-304 (Code 1858, § 2909 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 27, § 4; 1819, ch. 42, § 1); Shan., § 4630; Code 1932, § 8761; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-924), concerning sworn pleas, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 273, § 4.

20-6-305. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-6-305 (Code 1858, § 2911; Shan., § 4632; Code 1932, § 8763; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-925), concerning denial on want of knowledge, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 538, § 1.

20-6-306. Claims for contractual attorney fees.

If a plaintiff voluntarily dismisses an action while a counterclaim is pending for contractual attorney fees, and if the plaintiff does not timely recommence the action, the court, upon proper showing, may order that the counterclaimant is the prevailing party for the purpose of recovering contractual attorney fees.

This section shall only apply if the contract clause providing for attorney fees applies equally to all parties to the contract.

Acts 2004, ch. 853, § 1.